Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.120

Election set aside—Appeal period.

If an election is set aside by the judgment of the superior court and if no appeal is taken therefrom within ten days, the election of the person challenged or the outcome of the measure challenged, shall be thereby rendered void.

[ 2016 c 130 s 10; 2007 c 374 s 6; 2003 c 111 s 1712; 1965 c 9 s 29.65.120. Prior: Code 1881 s 3123, part; 1865 p 46 s 19, part; RRS s 5382, part. Formerly RCW 29.65.120.]